Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3467.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 196.22, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Support for veterans' initiatives; report. new text end new text begin The commissioner may direct nonmonetary agency resources, as available, to support initiatives relating to veterans' food insecurity, homelessness, suicide prevention, and other critical issues. By October 15 of each year, the commissioner must submit a report to the governor and the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over veterans affairs that provides information on the resources expended and the critical issues that were supported during the previous year. new text end